Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-1834
Civil service; municipality provide facilities and assistance.

The municipality shall afford the commission and its members and employees all reasonable facilities and assistance to inspect all books, papers, documents, and accounts applying or in any way appertaining to any and all positions and employments subject to civil service and shall produce such books, papers, documents, and accounts. All municipal officers and employees shall attend and testify whenever required to do so by the commission, the accused, or the appointing authority.

Laws 1943, c. 29, § 9, p. 133;

R.S.1943, § 19-1809;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 19-1809;

Laws 1985, LB 372, § 13.